Tennessee statutes. Title 71 Welfare
Part 6

Orphan Asylums

71-3-601. Governing board.

All orphan asylums or houses for destitute children, incorporated under the laws of the state, shall be governed by boards of managers, trustees, or directors, which shall consist of twelve (12) or more persons, five (5) or more of whom shall constitute a quorum.

Acts 1885, ch. 92, § 1; Shan., § 4343; Code 1932, § 4573; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 14-1201, 14-11-101.

Cross-References. Regulation of child welfare agencies generally, title 71, ch. 3, part 5.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 189.

71-3-602. Powers over property.

The corporations enumerated in §71-3-601 may own and hold real and personal property necessary for building, cultivation, and to rent out to raise means to assist in the support of such corporations.

Acts 1885, ch. 92, § 8; Shan., § 4351; Code 1932, § 4580; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 14-1202, 14-11-102.

71-3-603. Admission of children.

All such asylums or houses at the option of its board may receive or take charge of any destitute orphan or indigent child of either sex, or children of indigent parents, under eighteen (18) years of age, from any part of the state.

Acts 1885, ch. 92, § 3; Shan., § 4345; mod. Code 1932, § 4574; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 14-1203; Acts 1984, ch. 663, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §14-11-103.

71-3-604. Control of indigent children.

The children referred to in §71-3-603 shall be under the exclusive jurisdiction and control of the board until they become eighteen (18) years of age. The board may, in its discretion, require the parents of such indigent children to surrender all right and claim to the control of them, and to consent for the asylum to provide homes for them, by adoption by proper and suitable parties, for the purpose of caring for and educating them, teaching them trades and household duties generally.

Acts 1885, ch. 92, § 3; Shan., § 4346; Code 1932, § 4575; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 14-1204, 14-11-104.

71-3-605. [Reserved.]

No child shall be received into the asylum, or detained in the asylum, except that the welfare of the child may be thereby promoted, nor shall any child be indentured or given in adoption, except that the best interest of the child shall be thereby secured.

Acts 1885, ch. 92, § 4; Shan., § 4347; Code 1932, § 4576; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 14-1206, 14-11-106.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Law of Adoption, 3 Vand. L. Rev. 627.

71-3-607. Control of orphans and foundlings.

In all cases in which orphans or foundling children are placed in any of the orphan homes, whether voluntarily by their parent or parents or guardian or by the order of some competent court or other authority, or whether they come into the care and custody of any such institution as foundlings, the managing board shall have the right to retain the custody of such children until the children are eighteen (18) years of age; provided, that §71-3-609 applies; and provided further, that such institutions may, within such homes or asylums, provide for such children, or may so provide for them in homes of suitable families outside of such institutions.

Acts 1891, ch. 117, § 1; Shan., § 4353; Code 1932, § 4582; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 14-1207, 14-11-107.

71-3-608. Penalty for interference with children.

It is a Class B misdemeanor for any person to interfere in any way with any of such children in the control and custody of such homes while they are there or at the homes provided for them by such institutions.

Acts 1891, ch. 117, § 2; Shan., § 4354; Code 1932, § 4583; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 14-1208, 14-11-108; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 112.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class B misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

71-3-609. Petition to take child from home.

At any time after the assumption of control by any of such homes, if the parent or other person, in whom the legal custody of such child would otherwise be, believes such parent or other person entitled to the custody of the child, such person may file a petition in the chancery court of the county in which the home is situated, and set out the facts upon which action is sought, and notice thereof shall be given to such institution, and proof may be taken and the application decided as the chancellor, in the chancellor's sound judgment, may determine, both as to the merits and the adjudication of costs. For this purpose jurisdiction is conferred upon the chancery courts, with the right of appeal.

Acts 1891, ch. 117, § 3; Shan., § 4355; Code 1932, § 4584; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 14-1209, 14-11-109.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Chancery Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 281.

71-3-610. Education of children.

The board shall cause all children over six (6) years of age in such asylum to be instructed in such branches of useful knowledge as may be suited to their years and capabilities, and cause the girls to be taught domestic vocations, such as sewing, mending, knitting, and housekeeping in all its departments. The boys shall be taught such useful trades as the board may direct. All children in such asylums, of sufficient age, shall be taught according to the course of the common schools.

Acts 1885, ch. 92, § 5; Shan., § 4348; Code 1932, § 4577; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 14-1210, 14-11-110.

71-3-611. Expenses paid by parent or guardian.

Any of such asylums may, at discretion, receive any child placed in its care and keeping by such child's parents or guardian, or those having the child in charge, and may keep and care for the child until the child is eighteen (18) years of age, unless sooner taken away by the request of such child's parent or parents, or those having guardianship or control of the child. The asylum shall not receive any child under this section until its parent or parents, or guardian, or person having the child in charge, shall agree with the officers of the asylum to supply sufficient funds, or such portion of the funds as the board of managers may agree upon, for the maintenance of the child in the asylum during such child's stay, and shall further agree to abide by all rules, bylaws, and requirements of the asylum. Should a child be admitted having a guardian lawfully appointed and qualified, who has money or property of such child under such guardian's control, such guardian shall be required to pay to the asylum such portion of the child's funds as the guardian may lawfully use, or the guardian may be authorized to use, for the child's support.

Acts 1885, ch. 92, § 7; Shan., § 4350; Code 1932, § 4579; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 14-1211, 14-11-111.

71-3-612. County contributions to expenses.

The expenses of such asylum shall be met as follows, to wit: at the end of each fiscal year, each of the boards of managers shall make a statement of the financial condition of the asylum under its control, which shall especially show how much the necessary expenses of the asylum exceeded its income, and this excess shall be paid by the several counties that had a child or children in the asylum for any part of the fiscal year; each county shall pay so much per capita according to the number of children from that county in the asylum and the length of time that they were there. Of all these particulars, strict, accurate, and systematic accounts shall be kept by the officers of the board, and when the pro rata of any county shall be thus ascertained and a statement of the pro rata has been brought to the notice of the county mayor or financial agent of any such county, it shall be that person's duty forthwith to draw that person's warrant on the county trustee of the county in payment of the same. No county shall be liable to pay at a greater rate than fifty dollars ($50.00) per capita per annum for each child it had in the asylum, and no county shall pay any expenses of any children of that county unless the child or children be apprenticed to or sent to the asylum by the proper authorities, and by proper orders of the county legislative body.

Acts 1885, ch. 92, § 6; Shan., § 4349; Code 1932, § 4578; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 16, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 14-1212, 14-11-112; Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

This section may be affected by §9-1-116, concerning entitlement to funds, absent appropriation.